Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
CHAPTER 29 Juries [Repealed]

29.005.
Number of grand jurors — Number required to find an indictment. [Repealed.]

29.010.
Grand jury consists of twelve persons; qualifications. [Repealed.]

29.015.
Number of petit jurors in circuit courts and inferior courts. [Repealed.]

29.020.
Petit juries — Number of jurors — Qualifications. [Repealed.]

29.025.
Qualifications of jurors. [Repealed.]

29.030.
Persons exempt from jury service. [Repealed.]

29.035.
Exemptions from grand or petit jury service. [Repealed.]

29.040.
Ineligibility because of previous service or because name not on property valuation administrator’s book. [Repealed.]

29.045.
Ineligibility because of previous service or because name not on property valuation administrator’s book or voter’s registration book. [Repealed.]

29.050.
Jury commissioners — Appointment — Qualifications — Vacancies — Sessions — Meetings secret — Typist. [Repealed.]

29.055.
Jury commissioners, appointment, qualifications, vacancies, sessions — Meetings secret — Typist. [Repealed.]

29.060.
Compensation of commissioners. [Repealed.]

29.065.
Compensation of commissioners. [Repealed.]

29.070.
Selection of names for jury service — Number of names — Filling of drum. [Repealed.]

29.075.
Selection of names for jury service — Number of names — Filling of drum. [Repealed.]

29.080.
Delivery of drum and key to court — Oath to clerk and deputy — Drum or list not to be opened. [Repealed.]

29.085.
Delivery of drum and key to court — Oath administered to clerk or deputy. [Repealed.]

29.090.
Separate commissioners and drums in courts of continuous session having divisions or held in two places. [Repealed.]

29.095.
Separate commissioners and drums in courts of continuous session having divisions or held in two places. [Repealed.]

29.100.
Reconvening commissioners to supply additional names. [Repealed.]

29.105.
Reconvening commissioners to supply additional names. [Repealed.]

29.110.
Custody of drum and key. [Repealed.]

29.115.
Custody of drum and key. [Repealed.]

29.120.
Drums, keys and cases — Who to select — County to pay for. [Repealed.]

29.125.
Drums, keys and cases, selection of and payment for. [Repealed.]

29.130.
When judge to draw jury lists from drum — Number drawn — Procedure — Panels to be selected from lists. [Repealed.]

29.135.
Drawing of jury list from drum — Number drawn — Procedure — Selection of grand and petit jurors. [Repealed.]

29.140.
Delivery of lists and drum to clerk — Oath — Disclosure of names forbidden in certain counties. [Repealed.]

29.145.
Delivery of lists and drum to clerk. [Repealed.]

29.150.
Drawing lists when judge absent; special judge may draw. [Repealed.]

29.155.
Drawing lists when judge absent — Special judge may draw. [Repealed.]

29.160.
Summoning jury for special term — New drawing for next regular term. [Repealed.]

29.165.
Summoning jury for special term — New drawing for regular term. [Repealed.]

29.170.
Summoning jurors. [Repealed.]

29.175.
Summoning jurors. [Repealed.]

29.180.
Oath to sheriff and deputies. [Repealed.]

29.185.
Oath to sheriff and deputies. [Repealed.]

29.190.
Adjournment of juries. [Repealed.]

29.195.
Adjournment of juries. [Repealed.]

29.200.
When grand juries to be summoned. [Repealed.]

29.205.
When grand juries to be summoned. [Repealed.]

29.210.
Supplying deficiency in grand jury list; bystanders. [Repealed.]

29.215.
Replacement of grand juror who is ill or excused. [Repealed.]

29.220.
Foreman of grand jury — Oath to jurors. [Repealed.]

29.225.
Foreman of grand jury — Oath or affirmation of witnesses. [Repealed.]

29.230.
Charge to grand jury. [Repealed.]

29.235.
Charge to grand jury. [Repealed.]

29.240.
Sessions of grand jury limited — Extension of sessions — Special sessions. [Repealed.]

29.245.
Sessions of grand jury — Extension of sessions. [Repealed.]

29.250.
Calling panel of petit jury — Names to be drawn from box. [Repealed.]

29.255.
Calling panel of petit jury — Names to be drawn from box. [Repealed.]

29.260.
Selection of jury to try felony case. [Repealed.]

29.262.
Summoning jurors from adjoining county — Selection. [Repealed.]

29.265.
Officer not to converse with sworn jury. [Repealed.]

29.268.
Jury may view place where offense committed. [Repealed.]

29.270.
Selection of jury to try civil case. [Repealed.]

29.280.
Supplying deficiency in petit jury — Bystanders. [Repealed.]

29.290.
Number of peremptory challenges in civil cases. [Repealed.]

29.300.
Oath to petit jury in civil cases. [Repealed.]

29.301.
Jury may view property or place. [Repealed.]

29.302.
Admonition to jury upon separation. [Repealed.]

29.303.
Duty of jury and officer after submission — Separation. [Repealed.]

29.304.
Manner of giving information on law or evidence after submission. [Repealed.]

29.305.
Causes for discharge of jury. [Repealed.]

29.306.
Retrial of cases where jury discharged. [Repealed.]

29.310.
Officer not to converse with sworn jury. [Repealed.]

29.320.
Juror to disclose material facts known to him. [Repealed.]

29.325.
Manner of rendering verdict, poll of jury. [Repealed.]

29.330.
Three-fourths verdict in circuit court. [Repealed.]

29.335.
Written verdict required — Foreman to sign — Clerk to read. [Repealed.]

29.340.
Five-sixths or three-fourths verdict in inferior courts. [Repealed.]

29.350.
Corrupt verdict forbidden. [Repealed.]

29.360.
First panel of jury may be discharged after one week. [Repealed.]

29.370.
Jurors to attend and remain at court during sessions. [Repealed.]

29.380.
Person not to solicit jury service. [Repealed.]

29.390.
Pay of jurors. [Repealed.]

29.400.
Jury claims good for state taxes. [Repealed.]

29.410.
Jury fee — Who to pay — When taxed as costs. [Repealed.]

29.420.
One jury fee in consolidated cases. [Repealed.]

29.430.
Pauper not liable for jury fee. [Repealed.]

29.440.
Clerk to issue execution for jury fees. [Repealed.]

29.990.
Penalties. [Repealed.]